src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
Verb inflection
The Tokelauan language verbs inflect for number.

# Prefixes

LEXICON Verbs  splits to subgrups according to pl form

* S = syll; R, E = C V in redup pattern

* LEXICON 2v_pref  = 2-syllabic verbs with CV reduplication

* LEXICON 3v_pref  = 3-syllabic verbs with CV reduplication

* LEXICON tav_pref  = 3-syllabic verbs with CV to ta

* LEXICON ta_pref  = 2-syllabic verbs with ta prefix

* LEXICON 3redup_pref  = 2-syllabic verbs with full reduplication

* LEXICON 4redup_pref  = 2-syllabic verbs with full reduplication

# Suffixes

* LEXICON vsg  

* LEXICON vpl  

* LEXICON vtags  = adds POS and Sg, Pl tags as governed by the U flags

* LEXICON tvtags  = adds POS and Sg, Pl tags as governed by the U flags

* LEXICON tv  

* LEXICON redup_suff  = adds POS and Sg, Pl tags as governed by the U flags

* LEXICON redup_suff_sgflags  
* LEXICON redup_suff_plflags  

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-tkl/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
